Mississippi, session 2026, SB3403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Teddy Cleveland Null of Alcorn County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction on October 9, 1995, in Alcorn County on the charge of receiving stolen property, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years under the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections on probation.  He was released to parole on March 2, 1996, and was discharged on June 1, 1998. On August 2, 2002, he was convicted in Alcorn County on the charges of receiving stolen property, operating a chop shop, possession of stolen or altered vehicle parts, and burglary-residential for which the longest sentence he received was fifteen (15) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections with five (5) years suspended.  He was released to earned release supervision on November 9, 2006, and discharged on May 6, 2010. On December 7, 2016, he was convicted in Alcorn County on the charges of conspiracy to commit a crime and false statement for which he was sentenced to serve one (1) year on house arrest under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and five (5) years with intensive supervision.  He was released to parole on July 31, 2017, and discharged on October 10, 2017. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.